District of Columbia statutes.
25-410

Application for manager’s license.

The application for a manager’s license shall include:

(1)

Certification that he or she has obtained [and] read a copy of this title;

(2)

Written statements or evidence establishing to the satisfaction of the Board that the applicant meets all of the qualifications set forth in § 25-301; and

(3)

A copy of the applicant’s alcohol training and education certificate.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(r), 51 DCR 6525

Prior Codifications

For D.C. Law 13-298, see notes following § 25-101.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-187, in pars. (1) and (2), made nonsubstantive changes; and added par. (3).